Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1261.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding sections to read:SECTION 1. SECTION 7364(A)(3) OF TITLE 35 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED TO READ:§ 7364. ASSISTANCE TO FIRE COMPANIES AND EMS COMPANIES.(A) GENERAL RULE.--THE OFFICE IS AUTHORIZED, UPON APPLICATION OF ANY FIRE COMPANY OR EMS COMPANY, TO MAKE LOANS FOR THE FOLLOWING PURPOSES:<--<--<--1234567891011121314151617 * * *(3) PURCHASING PROTECTIVE, ACCESSORY OR COMMUNICATION EQUIPMENT. NO FIRE COMPANY OR EMS COMPANY SHALL RECEIVE A LOAN FOR PROTECTIVE, ACCESSORY OR COMMUNICATIVE EQUIPMENT MORE THAN ONCE IN ANY FIVE-YEAR PERIOD. EACH FIRE COMPANY OR EMS COMPANY MAY APPLY FOR A LOAN FOR A MOBILE AND PORTABLE RADIO UNIT FOR EACH EXISTING SERVICEABLE APPARATUS EQUIPMENT, AMBULANCE OR RESCUE VEHICLE. RADIO EQUIPMENT OBTAINED THROUGH LOANS UNDER THIS SUBCHAPTER SHALL BE EQUIPPED WITH A FREQUENCY OR FREQUENCIES LICENSED BY THE FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION FOR FIREFIGHTING OR EMERGENCY RESPONSE PURPOSES. P ROTECTIVE EQUIPMENT OBTAINED THROUGH LOANS UNDER THIS SUBCHAPTER MUST MEET STANDARDS ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSIONER TO ENSURE THAT THE PROTECTIVE EQUIPMENT DOES NOT CONTAIN PERFLUOROALKYL AND POLYFLUOROALKYL SUBSTANCES. A NOTARIZED FINANCIAL STATEMENT SHALL BE FILED AND LOANS UNDER THIS SUBCHAPTER FOR THE PURCHASE OF PROTECTIVE, ACCESSORY OR COMMUNICATIVE EQUIPMENT SHALL NOT EXCEED [$25,000] $100,000.* * *SECTION 2. TITLE 35 IS AMENDED BY ADDING SECTIONS TO READ:§ 7390. Protection against PFAS chemicals.(a) Firefighting foam management.-- (1) Except as provided under this subsection, beginning July 1, 2026 2027 , a manufacturer may not manufacture or knowingly sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale or distribute for use in this Commonwealth class B firefighting foam containing an intentionally added PFAS chemical.(2) Except as provided under this subsection, beginning January 1, 2027 2028 , a person, including a firefighting entity, may not use class B firefighting foam containing an 20250HB1261PN3231 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 intentionally added PFAS chemical in this Commonwealth.(3) This subsection shall not apply to the manufacture, sale, distribution or use of class B firefighting foam for which the inclusion of a PFAS chemical is required by Federal law, including 14 CFR 139.317 (relating to aircraft rescue and firefighting: equipment and agents). If a Federal requirement to include a PFAS chemical in class B firefighting foam is revoked after July 1, 2025 JANUARY 1, 2027 , this subsection shall not apply for one year after the requirement is revoked. The commissioner shall transmit notice of the date of revocation to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(4) This subsection shall not apply to any part of an exempt facility.(b) Duties of commissioner.--The commissioner shall have the following duties:(1) Assist a firefighting entity with evaluating and determining how to transition to the use of class B firefighting foam that does not contain an intentionally added PFAS chemical.(2) I n consultation with the Department of Environmental Protection, develop a plan for the responsible disposal, transportation, storage and destruction of any unexpended stock of class B firefighting foam containing an intentionally added PFAS chemical upon request by a firefighting entity. The commissioner shall maintain a list of vendors authorized to remove and incur liability in the transport and removal of the class B firefighting foam containing an intentionally added PFAS chemical.20250HB1261PN3231 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES, MAINTAIN A LIST OF VENDORS AUTHORIZED TO REMOVE AND INCUR LIABILITY IN THE TRANSPORT AND REMOVAL OF THE CLASS B FIREFIGHTING FOAM CONTAINING AN INTENTIONALLY ADDED PFAS CHEMICAL.(c) Enforcement.-- The Department of Environmental Protection shall receive and investigate complaints of any violation of this section. The Department of Environmental Protection may refer a suspected violation of this section to the Office of Attorney General. The Office of Attorney General may bring an action to impose a civil penalty for each violation under this section.(d) Penalties.-- (1) A person who violates this section shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 for a first offense.(2) A person who violates this section for a second or subsequent offense shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000.(3) Money collected under this subsection shall be deposited into the Fire Company Grant Program established under section 7811 (relating to establishment) . (e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Class B firefighting foam." A foam designed for extinguishing flammable-liquid fires."Exempt facility." An airport, chemical plant, oil refinery or flammable liquid or natural gas terminal, storage facility or distribution facility."Firefighting entity." An entity that engages in fire 20250HB1261PN3231 - 4 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prevention or control activities in this Commonwealth. The term includes a municipal fire department or volunteer fire company."Manufacturer." A person that manufactures, imports or distributes firefighting foam.§ 7391. Firefighting protective equipment.(a) Warning labels.--A manufacturer of personal protective equipment used in fire prevention, firefighting or fire control activities shall affix a warning label to such product sold for use in this Commonwealth that indicates if the product contains an intentionally added PFAS chemical. The following shall apply: (1) A manufacturer may provide further guidance about the content of an intentionally added PFAS chemical through the use of a quick-response code printed on the required warning label that directs the consumer to a dedicated publicly accessible Internet website maintained by the manufacturer that is specific to the affected personal protective equipment.(2) If, after the sale of personal protective equipment, a manufacturer learns and has true and accurate information that the personal protective equipment contains an intentionally added PFAS chemical, the manufacturer shall have the following duties:(i) Notify the last known purchaser of the presence of the intentionally added PFAS chemical.(ii) Post the relevant information on a dedicated publicly accessible Internet website maintained by the manufacturer that is specific to the affected personal protective equipment.(b) Enforcement.--The Office of the State Fire Commissioner shall enforce the provisions of this section.20250HB1261PN3231 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Violations.--(1) A manufacturer shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 for a first violation and $10,000 for each subsequent violation.(2) Money collected under paragraph (1) shall be transferred to the department for the Fire Company Grant Program and the Emergency Medical Services Grant Program.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Firefighting entity." An entity that engages in fire prevention, firefighting or fire control activities in this Commonwealth. The term shall include municipal fire departments and volunteer fire companies."Manufacturer." A person that manufactures, imports or distributes domestically personal protective equipment for a firefighting entity."Personal protective equipment." Items designed, intended or marketed to be worn by firefighting entity personnel in the performance of fire and rescue activities, including jackets, pants, shoes, gloves, helmets and respiratory equipment.Section 2 3. Section 7813(a) of Title 35 is amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 7813. Award of grants.(a) Authorization.--The commissioner is authorized to make a grant award to each eligible fire company for the following:* * *(8) Disposal, transportation, storage and destruction of any unexpended stock of class B firefighting foam containing an intentionally added PFAS chemical in compliance with 20250HB1261PN3231 - 6 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 7390(b)(2) (relating to protection against PFAS chemicals).(9) Purchase or acquisition of class B firefighting foam that does not contain an intentionally added PFAS chemical.* * *Section 3 4. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The addition of 35 Pa.C.S. § 7391 shall take effect in 180 days.(2) This section shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1261PN3231 - 7 - <--1234567891011